Tennessee, session 114, HB2021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-3-101(a), is amended by deleting
"structures extending no higher than the distal tibial metaphyseal flair" and substituting "of the
lower leg distal to the tibial tuberosity".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2021
011728
- 1 -